Tennessee, session 114, HB0884.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-1401(5), is amended by
deleting the following language:
(5) "Adult-oriented establishment" means any commercial establishment,
business or service, or portion thereof, that offers, as its principal or predominant stock
or trade, sexually-oriented material, devices, or paraphernalia or specified sexual
activities, or any combination or form thereof, whether printed, filmed, recorded or live
and that restricts or purports to restrict admission to adults or to any class of adults.
and substituting instead:
(5) "Adult-oriented establishment" means a facility, establishment, business, or
service, or portion thereof, that offers sexually oriented material, devices, or
paraphernalia; adult cabaret entertainment; or specified sexual activities, or any
combination or form thereof, whether printed, filmed, recorded, or live, and that restricts
or purports to restrict admission to adults or to any class of adults.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect May 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0884
001470
- 1 -